fr: Appareil électronique > Accessoires électroniques > Répartiteurs et commutateurs audio et vidéo: Répartiteurs et commutateurs 3,5 mm; Répartiteurs et commutateurs coaxiaux; Répartiteurs et commutateurs vidéo composante; Répartiteurs et commutateurs DVI; Répartiteurs et commutateurs DisplayPort; Répartiteurs et commutateurs HDMI; Répartiteurs et commutateurs RCA; Répartiteurs et commutateurs SDI; Répartiteurs et commutateurs Toslink; Répartiteurs et commutateurs VGA
ko: 전자기기 > 전자기기 부대용품 > 오디오 및 비디오 스플리터/스위치: 3.5mm 스플리터 및 스위치; 동축 스플리터 및 스위치; 컴포넌트 비디오 스플리터 및 스위치; DVI 스플리터/스위치; DisplayPort 스플리터 및 스위치; HDMI 스플리터/스위치; RCA 스플리터 및 스위치; SDI 스플리터 및 스위치; Toslink 스플리터 및 스위치; VGA 스플리터/스위치
de: Elektronik > Elektronisches Zubehör > Audio- und Video-Splitter & -Switches: 3,5-mm-Splitter und -Switches; Koaxial-Splitter und -Switches; Component-Video-Splitter und -Switches; DVI-Splitter und -Switches; DisplayPort-Splitter und -Switches; HDMI-Splitter & -Switches; RCA-Splitter und -Switches; SDI-Splitter und -Switches; Toslink-Splitter und -Switches; VGA-Splitter und -Switches
sv: Elektronik > Elektroniktillbehör > Kabeldelare och omkopplare för video och ljud: 3,5 mm-fördelare och omkopplare; Koaxialfördelare och omkopplare; Komponentvideofördelare och omkopplare; DVI-delare och -omkopplare; DisplayPort-fördelare och omkopplare; HDMI-kabeldelare och -omkopplare; RCA-fördelare och omkopplare; SDI-fördelare och omkopplare; Toslink-fördelare och omkopplare; VGA-delare och -omkopplare
cs: Elektronika > Elektronika – příslušenství > AV rozbočovače a přepínače: Rozbočovače a přepínače pro 3,5mm jack; Koaxiální rozbočovače a přepínače; Komponentní video rozbočovače a přepínače; Rozbočky a spínače DVI; DisplayPort rozbočovače a přepínače; Rozbočovače a přepínače HDMI; RCA rozbočovače a přepínače; SDI rozbočovače a přepínače; Toslink rozbočovače a přepínače; Rozbočky a spínače VGA
fi: Elektroniikka > Sähkötarvikkeet > AV-jakajat ja -kytkimet: 3,5 mm:n jakajat ja kytkimet; Koaksiaalijakajat ja -kytkimet; Komponenttivideojakajat ja -kytkimet; DVI-jakajat ja -kytkimet; DisplayPort-jakajat ja -kytkimet; HDMI-jakajat ja -kytkimet; RCA-jakajat ja -kytkimet; SDI-jakajat ja -kytkimet; Toslink-jakajat ja -kytkimet; VGA-jakajat ja -kytkimet
hr-HR: Elektronika > Pribor za elektroniku > Audio i video razdjelnici i sklopke: 3,5 mm razdjelnici i prekidači; Koaksijalni razdjelnici i prekidači; Komponentni videorazdjelnici i prekidači; DVI razdjelnici i sklopke; Razdjelnici i prekidači za DisplayPort; HDMI razdjelnici i sklopke; Razdjelnici i prekidači za RCA; Razdjelnici i prekidači za SDI; Razdjelnici i prekidači za Toslink; VGA razdjelnici i sklopke
en: Electronics > Electronics Accessories > Audio & Video Splitters & Switches: 3.5 mm Splitters & Switches; Coaxial Splitters & Switches; Component Video Splitters & Switches; DVI Splitters & Switches; DisplayPort Splitters & Switches; HDMI Splitters & Switches; RCA Splitters & Switches; SDI Splitters & Switches; Toslink Splitters & Switches; VGA Splitters & Switches
tr: Elektronik > Elektronik Alet Aksesuarları > Ses ve Görüntü Ayırıcıları ve Anahtarları: 3,5 mm Bölücüler ve Anahtarlar; Koaksiyel Bölücüler ve Anahtarlar; Component Video Bölücüler ve Anahtarlar; DVI Ayırıcıları ve Anahtarları; DisplayPort Bölücüler ve Anahtarlar; HDMI Ayırıcıları ve Anahtarları; RCA Bölücüler ve Anahtarlar; SDI Bölücüler ve Anahtarlar; Toslink Bölücüler ve Anahtarlar; VGA Ayırıcıları ve Anahtarları
ja: 電子機器 > 電気製品関連用品・PC周辺機器 > AVスプリッター・スイッチ: 3.5mmスプリッター・スイッチャー; 同軸スプリッター・スイッチャー; コンポーネントビデオスプリッター・スイッチャー; DVI スプリッター/スイッチ; DisplayPortスプリッター・スイッチャー; HDMI切替器・スイッチ; RCAスプリッター・スイッチャー; SDIスプリッター・スイッチャー; Toslinkスプリッター・スイッチャー; VGA スプリッター/スイッチ
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Acessórios eletrónicos > Splitters e interrutores de áudio e vídeo: Divisores e comutadores de 3,5 mm; Divisores e comutadores coaxiais; Divisores e comutadores de vídeo componente; Splitters e interrutores de DVI; Divisores e comutadores displayport; Splitters e interrutores de HDMI; Divisores e comutadores rca; Divisores e comutadores sdi; Divisores e comutadores toslink; Splitters e interrutores de VGA
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Αξεσουάρ ηλεκτρονικών συσκευών > Διαχωριστές & διακόπτες ήχου & βίντεο: Διαχωριστές & διακόπτες 3.5 mm; Διαχωριστές & διακόπτες ομοαξονικού; Διαχωριστές & διακόπτες συνιστωσών βίντεο; Διαχωριστές & διακόπτες DVI; Διαχωριστές & διακόπτες DisplayPort; Διαχωριστές & διακόπτες HDMI; Διαχωριστές & διακόπτες RCA; Διαχωριστές & διακόπτες SDI; Διαχωριστές & διακόπτες Toslink; Διαχωριστές & διακόπτες VGA
sk-SK: Elektronika > Elektronické príslušenstvo > Rozbočovače a prepínače zvuku a videa: 3,5 mm rozdeľovače a prepínače; Koaxiálne rozdeľovače a prepínače; Komponentové video rozdeľovače a prepínače; Rozbočovače a prepínače DVI; DisplayPort rozdeľovače a prepínače; Rozbočovače a prepínače HDMI; RCA rozdeľovače a prepínače; SDI rozdeľovače a prepínače; Toslink rozdeľovače a prepínače; Rozbočovače a prepínače VGA
it: Elettronica > Accessori dispositivi elettronici > Splitter e interruttori audio e video: Splitter e switch da 3,5 mm; Splitter e switch coassiali; Splitter e switch video component; Splitter e interruttori DVI; Splitter e switch DisplayPort; Splitter e interruttori HDMI; Splitter e switch RCA; Splitter e switch SDI; Splitter e switch Toslink; Splitter e interruttori VGA
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 电子配件 > 音频和视频分配器和切换器: 3.5 毫米分路器和切换器; 同轴分路器和切换器; 分量视频分路器和切换器; DVI 分配器与开关; DisplayPort 分路器和切换器; HDMI 分配器和切换器; RCA 分路器和切换器; SDI 分路器和切换器; Toslink 分路器和切换器; VGA 分配器与开关
sl-SI: Elektronika > Elektronski dodatki > Avdio in video razdelilniki in preklopniki: 3,5 mm razdelilniki in preklopniki; Koaksialni razdelilniki in preklopniki; Komponentni video razdelilniki in preklopniki; Razdelilniki in stikala DVI; DisplayPort razdelilniki in preklopniki; Razdelilniki in stikala HDMI; RCA razdelilniki in preklopniki; SDI razdelilniki in preklopniki; Toslink razdelilniki in preklopniki; Razdelilniki in stikala VGA
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > Phụ kiện thiết bị điện tử > Bộ chia và công tắc âm thanh và hình ảnh: Bộ tách và công tắc 3.5mm; Bộ tách và công tắc đồng trục; Bộ tách và công tắc video thành phần; Công tắc và bộ chia DVI; Bộ tách và công tắc DisplayPort; Bộ chia và công tắc HDMI; Bộ tách và công tắc RCA; Bộ tách và công tắc SDI; Bộ tách và công tắc Toslink; Công tắc và bộ chia VGA
pl: Elektronika > Akcesoria elektroniczne > Rozdzielacze i przełączniki do przesyłania obrazu i dźwięku: Rozdzielacze i przełączniki 3,5 mm; Rozdzielacze i przełączniki koaksjalne; Rozdzielacze i przełączniki wideo komponentu; Rozdzielacze i przełączniki DVI; Rozdzielacze i przełączniki DisplayPort; Rozdzielacze i przełączniki do HDMI; Rozdzielacze i przełączniki RCA; Rozdzielacze i przełączniki SDI; Rozdzielacze i przełączniki Toslink; Rozdzielacze i przełączniki VGA
ru: Электроника > Аксессуары для электроники > Разветвители и коммутаторы аудио- и видеосигналов: Разветвители и переключатели 3,5 мм; Коаксиальные разветвители и переключатели; Разветвители и переключатели компонентного видео; Разветвители и коммутаторы DVI; Разветвители и переключатели DisplayPort; Разветвители и коммутаторы HDMI; Разветвители и переключатели RCA; Разветвители и переключатели SDI; Разветвители и переключатели Toslink; Разветвители и коммутаторы VGA
lt-LT: Elektronika > Elektronikos priedai > Garso ir vaizdo skirstytuvai ir jungikliai: 3,5 mm skirstytuvai ir jungikliai; Koaksialiniai skirstytuvai ir jungikliai; Komponentiniai vaizdo įrašų skirstytuvai ir jungikliai; DVI skirstytuvai ir jungikliai; DisplayPort skirstytuvai ir jungikliai; HDMI skirstytuvai ir jungikliai; RCA skirstytuvai ir jungikliai; SDI skirstytuvai ir jungikliai; Toslink skirstytuvai ir jungikliai; VGA skirstytuvai ir jungikliai
ro-RO: Electronice > Accesorii electronice > Splittere și comutatoare audio și video: Splittere și switch-uri de 3,5 mm; Splittere și switch-uri coaxiale; Splittere și switch-uri video component; Splittere și comutatoare DVI; Splittere și switch-uri DisplayPort; Splittere și comutatoare HDMI; Splittere și switch-uri RCA; Splittere și switch-uri SDI; Splittere și switch-uri Toslink; Splittere și comutatoare VGA
nb: Elektronikk > Elektronikktilbehør > Lyd- og videosplittere og -brytere: 3,5 mm splittere og brytere; Koaksiale splittere og brytere; Komponentvideo-splittere og -brytere; DVI-splittere og -brytere; DisplayPort-splittere og -brytere; HDMI-splittere og -brytere; RCA-splittere og -brytere; SDI-splittere og -brytere; Toslink-splittere og -brytere; VGA-splittere og -brytere
bg-BG: Електроника > Аксесоари за електроника > Аудио- и видеосплитери и превключватели: 3.5 mm сплитери и превключватели; Коаксиални сплитери и превключватели; Компонентни видео сплитери и превключватели; DVI сплитери и превключватели; DisplayPort сплитери и превключватели; HDMI сплитери и превключватели; RCA сплитери и превключватели; SDI сплитери и превключватели; Toslink сплитери и превключватели; VGA сплитери и превключватели
es: Electrónica > Accesorios electrónicos > Divisores y conmutadores de audio y vídeo: Divisores y conmutadores de 3.5 mm; Divisores y conmutadores coaxiales; Divisores y conmutadores de video por componentes; Divisores y conmutadores DVI; Divisores y conmutadores DisplayPort; Divisores y conmutadores HDMI; Divisores y conmutadores RCA; Divisores y conmutadores SDI; Divisores y conmutadores Toslink; Divisores y conmutadores VGA
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 電子配件 > AV 分配器/切換器: 3.5 mm 分配器與切換器; 同軸分配器與切換器; 色差端子分配器與切換器; DVI 分配器/切換器; DisplayPort 分配器與切換器; HDMI 分配器/切換器; RCA 分配器與切換器; SDI 分配器與切換器; Toslink 分配器與切換器; VGA 分配器/切換器
da: Elektronik > Elektronik – tilbehør > Lyd og video – fordelere og omskiftere: 3,5 mm-fordelere og -omskiftere; Koaksiale fordelere og omskiftere; Komponentvideo – fordelere og omskiftere; DVI-fordelere og -omskiftere; DisplayPort – fordelere og omskiftere; HDMI-fordelere og -omskiftere; RCA-fordelere og -omskiftere; SDI-fordelere og -omskiftere; Toslink-fordelere og -omskiftere; VGA-splittere og -omskiftere
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > อุปกรณ์อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > สวิตช์และตลับแยก AV: ตัวแยกและสวิตช์ 3.5 มม.; ตัวแยกและสวิตช์โคแอกเชียล; ตัวแยกและสวิตช์วิดีโอคอมโพเนนต์; กล่องและตลับแยกสาย DVI; ตัวแยกและสวิตช์ DisplayPort; สวิตช์และตลับแยก HDMI; ตัวแยกและสวิตช์ RCA; ตัวแยกและสวิตช์ SDI; ตัวแยกและสวิตช์ Toslink; กล่องและตลับแยกสาย VGA
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Acessórios para eletrônicos > Divisores e comutadores de áudio e vídeo: Divisores e chaves de 3,5 mm; Divisores e chaves coaxiais; Divisores e chaves de vídeo componente; Divisores e comutadores DVI; Divisores e chaves DisplayPort; Divisores e comutadores HDMI; Divisores e chaves RCA; Divisores e chaves SDI; Divisores e chaves Toslink; Divisores e comutadores VGA
hu: Elektronika > Elektronikai kiegészítők > Audio- és videoelosztók és -kapcsolók: 3,5 mm-es elosztók és kapcsolók; Koaxiális elosztók és kapcsolók; Komponens videóelosztók és -kapcsolók; DVI elosztók és kapcsolók; DisplayPort-elosztók és -kapcsolók; HDMI elosztók és kapcsolók; RCA-elosztók és -kapcsolók; SDI-elosztók és -kapcsolók; Toslink-elosztók és -kapcsolók; VGA elosztók és kapcsolók
nl: Elektronica > Accessoires voor elektronica > Audio-/videosplitters en -schakelaars: 3.5 mm splitters en switches; Coaxiale splitters en switches; Component video splitters en switches; DVI-splitters en -schakelaars; DisplayPort splitters en switches; HDMI-splitters en -schakelaars; RCA splitters en switches; SDI splitters en switches; Toslink splitters en switches; VGA-splitters en -schakelaars